Utah statutes.
10-5-112.   Property tax levy set by ordinance -- Maximum -- Certification.

(1)  Not later than June 22 of each year, or August 17 in the case of a property tax increase under Sections 59-2-919 through 59-2-923, the council, at a regular meeting or special meeting called for that purpose, shall by ordinance or resolution set the real and personal property tax levy for town purposes, but the levy may be set at an appropriate later date with the approval of the State Tax Commission.

(2)  The combined levies for each town, for all purposes in any year, excluding the retirement of general obligation bonds and the payment of any interest, and taxes expressly authorized by law to be levied in addition, may not exceed .007 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property.

(3)  The town clerk shall certify the ordinance or resolution setting the levy to the county auditor, or auditors, if the town is located in more than one county, not later than June 22 of each year.

